Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6027YH (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. 2333 Section 1. Section 216C.11, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. A person with a disability, a person assisting a 3 person with a disability by controlling a service animal or 4 a service-animal-in-training, or a person training a service 5 animal has the right to be accompanied by a service animal 6 or service-animal-in-training, under control, in any of the 7 places listed in sections 216C.3 and 216C.4 and any other 8 place where a service animal or service-animal-in-training 9 is otherwise permitted or allowed by law without being 10 required to make additional payment for the service animal or 11 service-animal-in-training. The person is liable for damage 12 done to any premises or facility by a service animal or a 13 service-animal-in-training. 14